hi_android/foma/magyar.foma
define HarmRuleelol §igeelol§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                  §igeelol§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleae §ae§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §ae§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleeo §eo§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §eo§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteo §felteo§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ á | ó | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat+ "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteo§ -> e // .#. \"^"*  [ é | í ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteo§ -> ö // .#. \"^"*  [ ő | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat+ "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteo§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteo1 §felteo1§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ a | á | o | ó | u | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteo1§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ e | é | i | í ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteo1§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* [ ö | ő | ü | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteo1§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteo2 §felteo2§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ á | ó | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteo2§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ é ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteo2§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* [ ő | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteo2§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteo3 §felteo3§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ a | á | o | ó | u | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat2+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteo3§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ e | é | i | í ] \Vowel* Consgat2+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteo3§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* [ ö | ő | ü | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat2+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteo3§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat2* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleaen   §aen§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §aen§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleaet   §aet§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §aet§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleoe2   §oe2§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §oe2§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleoeue   §oeue§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §oeue§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                  §oeue§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleae2   §ae2§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §ae2§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAAAmely §AAAmely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                   §AAAmely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleAAmely §AAmely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                  §AAmely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
 
define HarmRuleIgeomely §igeomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _     ;
define HarmRuleIgeo2mely §igeo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ?*  ,,
                    §igeo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ;

define HarmRuleIgeumely §igeumely§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                    §igeumely§ -> u // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleIgeuomely §igeuomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                    §igeuomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleIgeamely §igeamely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ?*  ,,
                    §igeamely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _  ?*  ;

define HarmRuleIgeaamely §igeaamely§ -> á // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ?*  ,,
                    §igeaamely§ -> á // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _  ?*  ;

define HarmRuleIgeemely §igeemely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ,,
                    §igeemely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _  ,,
                    §igeemely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ;
define HarmRuleIgeija1mely  §igeija1mely§ -> j a // Vowel Consnosz*  "^" _ .o. 
                     §igeija1mely§ -> s a // Vowel s*  "^" _   .o. 
                     §igeija1mely§ -> z a // Vowel z*  "^" _   ; 
define HarmRuleIgejatokitek1mely  §igejatokitek1mely§ -> %$ á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel  [ s z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ -> %$ á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel [ z s ]  %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ -> s á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* s+ %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ -> á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* z z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ -> z á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ -> j á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel  \Vowel* "^" ?* [ Consnosz+ | Vowel ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ -> s á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel   Cons* s+ %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ ->  á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel   Cons* z z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ -> z á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel   Cons* z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1mely§ -> j á t o k // .#. \"^"* Vowel   Cons* [ Consnosz+ | Vowel ] %^ _   .o.
                     z -> s  || s _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> z  || s s %^ _ .o.
                     s -> z  || z _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> s  || z z %^ _ ;

define HarmRuleIgejakik1mely §igejakik1mely§ -> %$ á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel [ s z ] %^ _    .o. 
                     §igejakik1mely§ -> %$ á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel [ z s ] %^ _    .o. 
                     §igejakik1mely§ -> s á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* s %^ _    .o. 
                     §igejakik1mely§ -> z á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* z %^ _    .o. 
                     §igejakik1mely§ -> j á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* [ Consnosz | Vowel ]+ %^  _    .o. 
                     §igejakik1mely§ -> s á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel Cons* s+ %^ _    .o. 
                     §igejakik1mely§ -> á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel Cons* z z  %^ _    .o. 
                     §igejakik1mely§ -> z á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel Cons* z  %^ _    .o. 
                     §igejakik1mely§ -> j á k // .#. \"^"* Vowel Cons* [ Consnosz  | Vowel ]+ %^  _    .o. 
                     z -> s  || s _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> z  || s s %^ _ .o.
                     s -> z  || z _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> s  || z z %^ _ ;

define HarmRuleoe2mely   §oe2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §oe2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleae2mely   §ae2mely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §ae2mely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;

# j,l,n,r után t, többi után ett, ott, ött
define HarmRuleIgetattetmely §igetattetmely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
                     §igetattetmely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* \Consjlnr "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattetmely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
                     §igetattetmely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* \Consjlnr "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattetmely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
                     §igetattetmely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* \Consjlnr "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattetmely§ ->  0 // .#. \"^"* ?* Consjlnr "^" _  ;

define HarmRuleaemely §aemely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §aemely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleeomely §eomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §eomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteomely §felteomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ á | ó | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ é | í ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ ő | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteomely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                §felteomely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* \Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteo1mely §felteo1mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ a | á | o | ó | u | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteo1mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ e | é | i | í ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteo1mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ ö | ő | ü | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteo1mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteo2mely §felteo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ á | ó | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ é ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ ő | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteo2mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                §felteo2mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* \Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;


define HarmRulej §j§-> %$ // .#. \"^"* s z "^" _ .o.
                 §j§-> %$ // .#. \"^"* z s "^" _ .o.
                 §j§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* z z "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* s s "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> z // .#. \"^"* \s z "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> s // .#. \"^"* \z s "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> j // .#. \"^"* [ Consnosz | Vowel ] "^" _ .o.
                 §j§ -> z // .#. ?* \s z "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> s // .#. ?* \z s "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> j // .#. ?* [ Consnosz | Vowel ] "^" _ .o.
                 z -> s  || s _ %^ %$ .o.
                 %$ -> z  || s s %^ _ .o.
                 s -> z  || z _ %^ %$ .o.
                 %$ -> s  || z z %^ _ ;

define HarmRuleg §g§-> 0 // .#. \"^"* [ g g ] "^" _ .o.
                 §g§-> g //  ?*  _ ;

define HarmRuleszorelol §szorelol§ -> s z //  Vowel %^* Consnosz %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> s z //  Vowel %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> s z //  Vowel %^* [ n y | g y | t y | d d  ] %^ _ .o.
                        §szorelol§ -> a s z //  BackVowel %^* Cons+ %^* Consnosz %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> e s z //  FrontVowel %^* Cons+ %^* Consnosz %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> e l //  .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* Conssz+ %^  _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> ö l // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* Conssz+ %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> o l // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* Conssz+ %^ _ ;
#define HarmRuleszorelolmely §szorelolmely§ -> s z // .#. ?* %^ _ ;
